Hawaii statutes.
[§432G-18] Federally funded programs;
exemption. Requirements provided in this chapter relating to mandated
coverages or essential health benefits shall not be applicable to any dental
insurer offering dental insurance under a federally funded program under the
Social Security Act, as amended; provided that this exemption shall apply only
to that part of the dental insurer's business under the federally funded
program. [L 2013, c 191, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next